Illinois, session 104th, HB5648.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named sums, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and purposes 7hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the ordinary and 8contingent expenses of the Department of Revenue:9GOVERNMENT SERVICES10PAYABLE FROM THE PERSONAL PROPERTY TAX REPLACEMENT FUND:11  For a portion of the state's share of12   state's attorneys' and assistant13   state's attorneys' salaries,14   including prior years' costs....................19,518,80015  For a portion of the state's share of16   county public defenders' salaries pursuant17   to Section 3-4007 of the Counties Code,18   including prior years' costs....................11,138,70019  For the State's share of county supervisors20   of assessments or county assesors'21   salaries, as provided by law, including22   prior years' costs...............................4,518,00023  For additional compensation for local  HB5648- 2 -OMB104 00208 AAV 10208 b1   assessors, as provided by Sections 4-102   and 4-15 of the Property Tax Code..................350,0003  For additional compensation for local4   assessors, as provided by Section 4-205   of the Property Tax Code...........................510,0006  For additional compensation for county7   treasurers, as provided by Section 3-100078   of the Counties Code...............................663,0009  For the annual stipend for sheriffs as provided10   in subsection (d) of Section 4-6003 and11   Section 4-8002 of the Counties Code................663,00012  For the annual stipend to county coroners13   pursuant to Section 4-6002 of the Counties14   Code, including prior years' costs.................663,00015  For additional compensation for county16   auditors, pursuant to Section 4-600117   of the Counties Code, including prior18   years' costs.......................................123,50019    Total                                         $38,148,00020PAYABLE FROM MOTOR FUEL TAX FUND:21  For Reimbursement to International22   Fuel Tax Agreement Member States................32,000,00023  For Refunds......................................45,000,00024    Total                                         $77,000,00025PAYABLE FROM UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK FUND:26  For Refunds as provided for in Section  HB5648- 3 -OMB104 00208 AAV 10208 b1   13a.8 of the Motor Fuel Tax Law.....................12,0002PAYABLE FROM THE MUNICIPAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS FUND:3  For refunds associated with the Simplified4   Municipal Telecommunications Tax Act................12,0005PAYABLE FROM LOCAL GOVERNMENT VIDEO GAMING6DISTRIBUTIVE FUND:7  For allocation to local governments8   of the net terminal income tax per9   the Video Gaming Act...........................250,000,00010PAYABLE FROM SENIOR CITIZENS REAL ESTATE11DEFERRED TAX REVOLVING FUND:12  For payments to counties as required by the13   Senior Citizens Real Estate Tax Deferral Act,14   including prior years' cost......................6,500,00015PAYABLE FROM ILLINOIS GAMING LAW ENFORCEMENT FUND:16  For Allocation to Local Law Enforcement17   Agencies for joint state and local efforts18   in Administration of the Charitable Games19   Act and the Illinois Pull Tabs and20   Jar Games Act......................................750,000 21    Section 10. The sum of $36,408,900, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 23Fund to the Department of Revenue for operational expenses. 24    Section 15. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as   HB5648- 4 -OMB104 00208 AAV 10208 b1may be necessary, is appropriated from the Tax Compliance and 2Administration Fund to the Department of Revenue for Refunds 3associated with the Illinois Secure Choice Savings Program 4Act. 5    Section 20. The sum of $132,995,600, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the Tax Compliance and 7Administration Fund to the Department of Revenue for 8operational expenses. 9    Section 25. The following named sums, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 11purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 12ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of Revenue:13TAX ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT14PAYABLE FROM TAX COMPLIANCE AND ADMINISTRATION FUND:15  For Administration of the Drycleaner16   Environmental Response Trust Fund Act..............188,20017  For Administration of the Simplified Municipal18   Telecommunications Tax Act.......................3,651,20019  For administrative costs associated20   with the Municipality Sales Tax21   as directed in Section 11-74.3-322   of the Illinois Municipal Code.....................253,20023  For costs associated with administering Section24   4g of the Cigarette Tax Act......................1,490,800  HB5648- 5 -OMB104 00208 AAV 10208 b1    Total                                          $5,583,400 2    Section 30. The sum of $1,500,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Cannabis Regulation 4Fund to the Department of Revenue for operational expenses 5associated with the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 6    Section 35. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 7be necessary, is appropriated from the Tennessee Valley 8Authority Local Trust Fund to the Department of Revenue for 9tax receipt distributions pursuant to Section 13 of the 10Tennessee Valley Authority Act. 11    Section 40. The sum of $12,096,500, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the Personal Property 13Tax Replacement Fund to the Department of Revenue for a 14portion of the state's share of county sheriff's salaries 15pursuant to action taken by the 102nd General Assembly, 16including prior years' costs. 17    Section 45. The sum of $49,553,300, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the Motor Fuel Tax Fund 19to the Department of Revenue for operational expenses. 20    Section 50. The sum of $42,315,300, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Personal Property   HB5648- 6 -OMB104 00208 AAV 10208 b1Tax Replacement Fund to the Department of Revenue for 2operational expenses. 3    Section 55. The sum of $2,668,000, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated from the Underground Storage 5Tank Fund to the Department of Revenue for operational 6expenses. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 82026.